Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 55. Sentencing and Probation.
Sec. 12.55.039.
Surcharge.

In addition to any fine or other penalty prescribed by law, a defendant who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, forfeits bail for, or is convicted of a

felony shall be assessed a surcharge of $200;

violation of a misdemeanor offense under AS

28.33.030

,

28.33.031

, AS

28.35.030

, or

28.35.032

, or a violation of a municipal ordinance comparable to a misdemeanor offense under AS

28.33.030

,

28.33.031

, AS

28.35.030

, or

28.35.032

and adopted under AS

28.01.010

, shall be assessed a surcharge of $150;

misdemeanor or a violation of a municipal ordinance if a sentence of incarceration may be imposed for the misdemeanor or ordinance violation, other than a provision identified in (2) of this subsection, shall be assessed a surcharge of $100;

misdemeanor for which a sentence of incarceration may not be imposed, a violation or an infraction under state law, or a violation of a municipal ordinance imposing a penalty authorized by AS

29.25.070(a)

if a sentence of incarceration may not be imposed for the ordinance violation, shall be assessed a surcharge of $20 if the fine or bail forfeiture amount for the offense is $30 or more.

A court may not fail to impose the surcharge required under this section. The surcharge may not be waived, deferred, or suspended. A court may allow a defendant who is unable to pay the surcharge required to be imposed under this section to perform community work under AS

12.55.055(c)

in lieu of the surcharge.

The surcharge shall be paid within 10 days of imposition or such shorter period of time as ordered by the court. Failure to pay the surcharge is punishable as contempt of court. Proceedings to collect the surcharge may be instituted by the state, the municipality, or by the court on its own motion.

Money collected under this section shall be deposited into the general fund and accounted for under AS

37.05.142

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2000; am § 16 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendments to subsection (a), see sec. 30(c), ch. 22, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a)(1), substituted “$200” for “$100”, in (a)(2), substituted “$150” for “$75”, in (a)(3), substituted “$100” for “$50”, in (a)(4) substituted “a surcharge of $20” for “a surcharge of $10” following “shall be assessed”, near the end.

Sec. 12.55.040.
Increased punishment for habitual criminal after conviction of petty larceny or misdemeanor involving fraud. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 12.55.041.
Correctional facility surcharge.

In addition to any fine or other penalty prescribed by law, a defendant who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, or is convicted of, a crime under state law shall pay a correctional facility surcharge if, in connection with the crime, the defendant

was arrested and taken to a correctional facility, regardless of whether the defendant was released or admitted to the facility; or

is sentenced to serve a term of imprisonment.

The court shall impose a single surcharge under (a) of this section on a defendant being sentenced for one or more crimes in a single judgment. The surcharge is

$100 if the judgment includes a sentence for a felony;

$50 if the judgment does not include a sentence for a felony.

If the court places the defendant on probation, the court shall order that the defendant pay an additional correctional facility surcharge of $100. The additional surcharge shall be suspended but later imposed if the defendant’s probation is revoked and, in connection with the probation revocation, the defendant

was arrested and taken to a correctional facility, regardless of whether the defendant was released or admitted to the facility; or

is ordered to serve a term of imprisonment for the probation revocation.

The court shall include a surcharge imposed under (a) of this section in the judgment of conviction. The court shall include the imposition of a surcharge under (c) of this section in the order revoking probation. For a surcharge that is not paid by the person as required by this section, the state shall seek reimbursement from the person’s permanent fund dividend as provided under AS

43.23.140

. For purposes of collection and priority of attachment under AS

43.23.140

, a surcharge imposed under this section is accounted for in the same manner as a cost of imprisonment under AS

28.35.030(k)

and

28.35.032(o)

. The state may enforce payment of a surcharge under this section under AS 09.35 as if it were a civil judgment enforceable by execution. This subsection does not limit the authority of the court to enforce surcharges.

In this section, “correctional facility” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 88 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.140

” was substituted for “43.23.065” in subsection (d) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Sec. 12.55.045.
Restitution and compensation.

The court shall, when presented with credible evidence, unless the victim or other person expressly declines restitution, order a defendant convicted of an offense to make restitution as provided in this section, including restitution to the victim or other person injured by the offense, to a public, private, or private nonprofit organization that has provided or is or will be providing counseling, medical, or shelter services to the victim or other person injured by the offense, or as otherwise authorized by law. The court shall, when presented with credible evidence, unless the victim expressly declines restitution, also order a defendant convicted of an offense to compensate a victim that is a nonprofit organization for the value of labor or goods provided by volunteers if the labor or goods were necessary to alleviate or mitigate the effects of the defendant’s crime. In determining the amount and method of payment of restitution or compensation, the court shall take into account the

public policy that favors requiring criminals to compensate for damages and injury, including loss of income, to their victims; and

financial burden placed on the victim and those who provide services to the victim and other persons injured by the offense as a result of the criminal conduct of the defendant.

An order of restitution under this section does not limit any civil liability of the defendant arising from the defendant’s conduct.

If a defendant is sentenced to pay restitution, the court may grant permission for the payment to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments. If the defendant fails to make one or more payments required under this section, the victim or the state on the victim’s behalf may enforce the total amount remaining under the order of restitution as provided in (l) of this section.

In any case, including a case in which the defendant is convicted of a violation of AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

and the property is commercial fishing gear as defined in AS

16.43.990

, the court shall consider the victim’s loss, and the order of restitution may include compensation for loss of income.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 17 SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 17 SLA 2004.]

The court may not, in ordering the amount of restitution, consider the defendant’s ability to pay restitution.

In imposing restitution under this section, the court may require the defendant to make restitution by means other than the payment of money.

An order of restitution made under this section is a condition of the defendant’s sentence and, in cases in which the court suspends all or a portion of the defendant’s sentence, the order of restitution is a condition of the suspended sentence. If the court suspends imposition of sentence under AS

12.55.085

, the order of restitution is a condition of the suspended imposition of sentence.

A defendant who is convicted of an offense for which restitution may be ordered shall submit financial information as ordered by the court. The Alaska Court System shall prepare a form, in consultation with the Department of Law, for the submission of the information; the form must include a warning that submission of incomplete or inaccurate information is punishable as unsworn falsification in the second degree under AS

11.56.210

. A defendant who is convicted of (1) a felony shall submit the form to the probation office within 30 days after conviction, and the probation officer shall attach the form to the presentence report, or (2) a misdemeanor shall file the form with the defendant’s response or opposition to the restitution amount. The defendant shall provide a copy of the completed form to the prosecuting authority.

The court, on its own motion or at the request of the prosecuting authority or probation officer, may order a defendant on probation who has been ordered to pay restitution to submit financial information to the court using the form specified in (j) of this section. The defendant shall file the completed form with the court within five days after the court’s order. The defendant shall provide a copy of the completed form to the prosecuting authority and the person’s probation officer, if any.

An order by the court that the defendant pay restitution is a civil judgment for the amount of the restitution. An order by the court that the defendant pay restitution when the court suspends entry of judgment under AS

12.55.078

or suspends imposition of sentence under AS

12.55.085

is a civil judgment for the amount of the restitution and remains enforceable and is not discharged when the proceeding is dismissed under AS

12.55.078

or a conviction is set aside under AS

12.55.085

. The victim or the state on behalf of the victim may enforce the judgment through any procedure authorized by law for the enforcement of a civil judgment. If the victim enforces or collects restitution through civil process, collection costs and full reasonable attorney fees shall be awarded. If the state on the victim’s behalf enforces or collects restitution through civil process, collection costs and full reasonable attorney fees shall be awarded, up to a maximum of twice the amount of restitution owing at the time the civil process was initiated. This section does not limit the authority of the court to enforce orders of restitution.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, the court shall accept

payments of restitution from a defendant at any time; and

prepayments of restitution or payments in anticipation of an order of restitution.

In determining the amount of actual damages or loss for restitution under this section, the court shall value property as the market value of the property at the time and place of the crime or, if the market value cannot reasonably be ascertained, the cost of replacement of the property within a reasonable time after the crime.

In this section,

“conviction” means that the defendant has entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or nolo contendere, or has been found guilty or guilty but mentally ill by a court or jury;

“loss of income” includes the total loss of income a business or person suffers as a result of not having stolen property available during the time it takes to obtain a replacement.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 38 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 75 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 53 SLA 1991; am §§ 3, 4 ch 71 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 1996; am §§ 3, 4 ch 103 SLA 2000; am §§ 9, 10 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2003; am §§ 1 — 4, 7 ch 17 SLA 2004; am § 11 ch 42 SLA 2006; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 17 SLA 2015; am § 10 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (

l

), in the second sentence, inserted “suspends entry of judgment under AS12.55.078 or” following “when the court” and “the proceeding is dismissed under AS

12.55.078

or” following “is not discharged when”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (m)(2), deleted the second sentence, which read, “If the recipient has elected to have the Department of Law collect the judgment of restitution under AS

12.55.051(g)

, the court shall forward all payments of restitution to the Department of Law within five days after the court’s acceptance.”

Cross references. —

Enforcement of fines and restitution — AS

12.55.051

Suspension of Commercial License and Entry Permit — AS

16.05.710

Theft in the first, second, third, and fourth degree - AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.150

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: VI, 54-56.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (m) was enacted as (n); relettered in 2004. Subsection (n) was enacted as (o); relettered in 2015. Subsection (o) was relettered from (n) in 2015 and from (m) to (n) in 2004.

Cross references. —

For restitution as condition of probation, see AS

12.55.100

; for requirement that court suspend commercial fishing privileges of certain defendants, see AS

16.05.710(b)

.

For the applicability provision relating to the 2015 amendments to this section amending paragraph (a)(1), adding a new subsection (n), and adding a new paragraph (o)(2), see sec. 5, ch. 17, SLA 2015.

Sec. 12.55.050.
Increased punishment for persons convicted of more than one felony. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For sentences of imprisonment for felonies, see AS 12.55.125.]

Sec. 12.55.051.
Enforcement of fines and restitution.

If the defendant defaults in the payment of a fine or any installment or of restitution or any installment, the court may order the defendant to show cause why the defendant should not be sentenced to imprisonment for nonpayment and, if the payment was made a condition of the defendant’s probation, may revoke the probation of the defendant. In a contempt or probation revocation proceeding brought as a result of failure to pay a fine or restitution, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant was unable to pay despite having made continuing good faith efforts to pay the fine or restitution. If the court finds that the defendant was unable to pay despite having made continuing good faith efforts, the defendant may not be imprisoned solely because of the inability to pay. If the court does not find that the default was attributable to the defendant’s inability to pay despite having made continuing good faith efforts to pay the fine or restitution, the court may order the defendant imprisoned until the order of the court is satisfied. A term of imprisonment imposed under this section may not exceed one day for each $50 of the unpaid portion of the fine or restitution or one year, whichever is shorter. Credit shall be given toward satisfaction of the order of the court for every day a person is incarcerated for nonpayment of a fine or restitution.

When a fine or restitution is imposed on an organization, the person authorized to make disbursements from the assets of the organization shall pay the fine or restitution from those assets. A person required to pay a fine or restitution under this subsection who intentionally refuses or fails to make a good faith effort to pay is punishable under (a) of this section.

A defendant who has been sentenced to pay a fine or restitution may request a hearing regarding the defendant’s ability to pay the fine or restitution at any time that the defendant is required to pay all or a portion of the fine or restitution. The court may deny the request if it has previously considered the defendant’s ability to pay and the defendant’s request does not allege changed circumstances. If, at a hearing under this subsection, the defendant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant will be unable through good faith efforts to satisfy the order requiring payment of the fine or restitution, the court shall modify the order so that the defendant can pay the fine or restitution through good faith efforts. The court may reduce the fine ordered, change the payment schedule, or otherwise modify the order. The court may not reduce an order of restitution but may change the payment schedule.

The state may enforce payment of a fine against a defendant under AS 09.35 as if the order were a civil judgment enforceable by execution. This subsection does not limit the authority of the court to enforce fines.

The Department of Law is authorized to collect restitution on behalf of the recipient unless

the recipient elects as provided in (f) of this section to enforce the order of restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law; or

the order requires restitution to be made in a form other than payment of a specific dollar amount.

The court shall forward a copy of an order of restitution to the Department of Law and the office of victims’ rights when the judgment is entered. Along with the copy of the order, the court shall provide the name, date of birth, social security number, and current address of the recipient of the restitution and the defendant, to the extent that the court has that information in its possession. Upon receipt of the order and other information from the court, the Department of Law shall send a notice to the recipient regarding the recipient’s rights under this section, including the right to elect to enforce the order of restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law and of the possibility of, and procedure for, receiving payment from the restorative justice account. The information provided to the Department of Law and the office of victims’ rights under this subsection is confidential and is not open to inspection as a public record under AS

40.25.110

. The Department of Law, the office of victims’ rights, or agents for the Department of Law or office of victims’ rights may not disclose the information except as necessary to collect on the restitution.

The Department of Law may not begin collection procedures on the order of restitution until the recipient has been given notice and has been given 90days after receipt of notice to elect to collect the restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law. If the Department of Law receives a response to the notice before the 90-day period, the Department of Law may begin collection on the restitution. A recipient may inform the Department of Law at a later time of the recipient’s election to collect the restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law; upon receipt of that information, the Department of Law may no longer proceed with collection efforts on behalf of the recipient. A recipient who has elected under this section to collect restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law may not later request the services of that department to collect the restitution.

If the Department of Law or its agents proceed to collect restitution on behalf of a recipient under (g) of this section, the actions of the Department of Law or an agent of the Department of Law on behalf of the recipient do not create an attorney-client relationship between the Department of Law and the recipient. The Department of Law or its agents may not settle a judgment for restitution without the consent of the recipient of the restitution.

An action for damages may not be brought against the state or any of its agents, officers, or employees based on an action or omission under this section.

The Department of Law may enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the collection procedures of this section. The Department of Law may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the collection procedures of this section, including the reimbursement of attorney fees and costs in appropriate cases.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 3, 4 ch 75 SLA 1988; am §§ 5, 6 ch 71 SLA 1992; am §§ 11, 12 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 5 ch 17 SLA 2004; am § 73 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 2, 3 ch 21 SLA 2018; am § 67 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Fines — AS

12.55.035

Restitution — AS

12.55.045

Definition of “Organization” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — AS

12.55.010

.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (a), see sec. 185(g), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective April 22, 2004, in subsection (c), deleted “or restitution” following “fine” in the next-to-last sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), at the end of the first sentence, inserted “subject to the limits set out in AS

12.55.110

”, at the end of the fourth sentence, substituted “subject to the limits set out in AS

12.55.110

” for “until the order of the court is satisfied”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (f), inserted “and the office of victims' rights” following “Department of Law” in the first sentence, added “and of the possibility of, and procedure for, receiving payment from the restorative justice account” at the end of the third sentence, rewrote the last sentence, which read, “The Department of Law or its agents may not disclose the information except as necessary to collect on the restitution”; in (g), in the first sentence, substituted “has been given 90 days” for “has been given 30 days” following “given notice and”, added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), deleted “subject to the limits set out in AS

12.55.110

” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “imprisoned until the order of the court is satisfied”
for “imprisoned subject to the limits set out in AS

12.55.110

” at the end of the fourth sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(b),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (a) of this section applies “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

A prisoner incarcerated for failure to pay a fine should not receive credit for good time during the period of incarceration. October 27, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 12.55.055.
Community work.

The court may order a defendant convicted of an offense to perform community work as a condition of probation, a suspended sentence, suspended imposition of sentence, or suspended entry of judgment, or in addition to any fine or restitution ordered. If the defendant is sentenced to imprisonment, the court may recommend to the Department of Corrections that the defendant perform community work.

Community work includes work on projects designed to reduce or eliminate environmental damage, protect the public health, or improve public lands, forests, parks, roads, highways, facilities, or education. Community work may not confer a private benefit on a person except as may be incidental to the public benefit.

The court may offer a defendant convicted of an offense the option of performing community work in lieu of a fine, surcharge, or portion of a fine or surcharge if the court finds the defendant is unable to pay the fine. The value of community work in lieu of a fine is the state’s minimum wage for each hour.

The court may offer a defendant convicted of an offense the option of performing community work in lieu of a sentence of imprisonment. Substitution of community work shall be at a rate of eight hours for each day of imprisonment. A court may not offer substitution of community work for any mandatory minimum period of imprisonment or for any period within the presumptive range of imprisonment for the offense.

Medical benefits for an individual injured while performing community work at the direction of the state shall be assumed by the state to the extent not covered by collateral sources. When the state pays medical benefits under this subsection, a claim for medical expenses by the injured individual against a third party is subrogated to the state.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 71 SLA 1996.]

The court may not

offer a defendant convicted of an offense the option of serving jail time in lieu of performing uncompleted community work previously ordered by the court; or

convert uncompleted community work hours into a sentence of imprisonment.

If a court orders community work as part of the defendant’s sentence under this section, the court shall provide notice to the defendant at sentencing and include as a provision of the judgment that if the defendant fails to provide proof of community work within 20 days after the date set by the court, the court shall convert those community work hours to a fine equal to the number of uncompleted work hours multiplied by the state’s minimum hourly wage and issue a judgment against the defendant for that amount.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 55, § 8 (1984); am §§ 1, 2 ch 104 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 53 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 119 SLA 1994; am § 11 ch 71 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 2 SLA 2005; am §§
74 — 76 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: VI, 59-60.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(f), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts. For the effect of the 2016 amendments to this section on Rule 32, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see sec. 180(b), ch. 36, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective March 23, 2005, in subsection (d) substituted “for any period within the presumptive range of imprisonment for the offense” for “for any period of a presumptive term of imprisonment.”

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), substituted “suspended imposition of sentence, or suspended entry of judgment,” for “or suspended imposition of sentence”; in (c), substituted “the state’s minimum wage for each hour” for “$3 per hour”; added (g) and (h).

Secs. 12.55.060 — 12.55.075.
Prior convictions; sentencing reports; imposition of sentence. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 12.55.078.
Suspending entry of judgment.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, if a person is found guilty or pleads guilty to a crime, the court may, with the consent of the defendant and the prosecution and without imposing or entering a judgment of guilt, defer further proceedings and place the person on probation. The period of probation may not exceed the applicable terms set out in AS

12.55.090(c)

. The court may not impose a sentence of imprisonment under this subsection.

The court shall impose conditions of probation for a person on probation as provided in (a) of this section, which may include that the person

abide by all local, state, and federal laws;

not leave the state without prior consent of the court;

pay restitution as ordered by the court; and

obey any other conditions of probation set by the court.

At any time during the probationary term of the person released on probation, a probation officer may, without warrant or other process, rearrest the person so placed in the officer’s care and bring the person before the court, or the court may, in its discretion, issue a warrant for the rearrest of the person. The court may revoke and terminate the probation if the court finds that the person placed on probation is

violating the conditions of probation;

engaging in criminal practices; or

violating an order of the court to participate in or comply with the treatment plan of a rehabilitation program under AS

12.55.015(a)(10)

.

If the court finds that the person has successfully completed probation, the court shall, at the end of the probationary period set by the court, or at any time after the expiration of one year from the date the original probation was imposed, discharge the person and dismiss the proceedings against the person. A person who is discharged under this subsection is not convicted of a crime.

If the court finds that the person has violated the conditions of probation ordered by the court, the court may revoke and terminate the person’s probation, enter judgment on the person’s previous plea or finding of guilt, and pronounce sentence at any time within the maximum probation period authorized by this section.

The court may not suspend the imposition or entry of judgment and may not defer prosecution under this section of a person who

is charged with a violation of AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.220

,

11.41.260

—

11.41.320

,

11.41.360

—

11.41.370

,

11.41.410

—

11.41.530

, AS

11.46.400

, AS

11.61.125

—

11.61.128

, or AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.135

;

uses a firearm in the commission of the offense for which the person is charged;

has previously been granted a suspension of judgment under this section or a similar statute in another jurisdiction, unless the court enters written findings that by clear and convincing evidence the person’s prospects for rehabilitation are high and suspending judgment under this section adequately protects the victim of the offense, if any, and the community;

is charged with a violation of AS

11.41.230

,

11.41.250

, or a felony and the person has one or more prior convictions for a misdemeanor violation of AS 11.41 or for a felony or for a violation of a law in this or another jurisdiction having similar elements to an offense defined as a misdemeanor in AS 11.41 or as a felony in this state; for the purposes of this paragraph, a person shall be considered to have a prior conviction even if

the charges were dismissed under this section;

the conviction has been set aside under AS

12.55.085

; or

the charge or conviction was dismissed or set aside under an equivalent provision of the laws of another jurisdiction; or

is charged with a crime involving domestic violence, as defined in AS

18.66.990

.

History.

(§ 77 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 11 — 13 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(h), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.For the effect of the 2016 amendments to this section on Rule 43, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, see sec. 180(c), ch. 36, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendments to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (a), added the last sentence; in (f)(1) and (4), substituted “is charged with” for “is convicted of” at the beginning, in (f)(2), substituted “charged” for “convicted” at the end, in (f)(5), substituted “is charged with” for “has been convicted of” at the beginning.

Effective dates. —

Section 188, ch. 36, SLA 2016 makes this section effective July 1, 2016.

Sec. 12.55.080.
Suspension of sentence and probation.

Upon entering a judgment of conviction of a crime, or at any time within 60 days from the date of entry of that judgment of conviction, a court, when satisfied that the ends of justice and the best interest of the public as well as the defendant will be served thereby, may suspend the imposition or execution or balance of the sentence or a portion thereof, and place the defendant on probation for a period and upon the terms and conditions as the court considers best.

History.

(§ 8.08 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 24 ch 43 SLA 1964; am § 8 ch 68 SLA 1965)

Cross references. —

For modification of sentences, see AS

12.55.088

.

Sec. 12.55.085.
Suspending imposition of sentence.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, if it appears that there are circumstances in mitigation of the punishment, or that the ends of justice will be served, the court may, in its discretion, suspend the imposition of sentence and may direct that the suspension continue for a period of time, not exceeding the maximum term of sentence that may be imposed or a period of one year, whichever is greater, and upon the terms and conditions that the court determines, and shall place the person on probation, under the charge and supervision of the probation officer of the court during the suspension.

At any time during the probationary term of the person released on probation, a probation officer may, without warrant or other process, rearrest the person so placed in the officer’s care and bring the person before the court, or the court may, in its discretion, issue a warrant for the rearrest of the person. The court may revoke and terminate the probation if the interests of justice require, and if the court, in its judgment, has reason to believe that the person placed upon probation is

violating the conditions of probation;

engaging in criminal practices; or

violating an order of the court to participate in or comply with the treatment plan of a rehabilitation program under AS

12.55.015(a)(10)

.

Upon the revocation and termination of the probation, the court may pronounce sentence at any time within the maximum probation period authorized by this section, subject to the limitation specified in AS

12.55.086(c)

.

The court may at any time during the period of probation revoke or modify its order of suspension of imposition of sentence. It may at any time, when the ends of justice will be served, and when the good conduct and reform of the person held on probation warrant it, terminate the period of probation and discharge the person held. If the court has not revoked the order of probation and pronounced sentence, the defendant shall, at the end of the term of probation, be discharged by the court.

Upon the discharge by the court without imposition of sentence, the court may set aside the conviction and issue to the person a certificate to that effect.

The court may not suspend the imposition of sentence of a person who

is convicted of a violation of AS

11.41.100

—

11.41.220

,

11.41.260

—

11.41.320

,

11.41.360

—

11.41.370

,

11.41.410

—

11.41.530

, AS

11.46.400

, AS

11.61.125

—

11.61.128

, or AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.135

;

uses a firearm in the commission of the offense for which the person is convicted; or

is convicted of a violation of AS

11.41.230

—

11.41.250

or a felony and the person has one or more prior convictions for a misdemeanor violation of AS 11.41 or for a felony or for a violation of a law in this or another jurisdiction having similar elements to an offense defined as a misdemeanor in AS 11.41 or as a felony in this state; for the purposes of this paragraph, a person shall be considered to have a prior conviction even if that conviction has been set aside under (e) of this section or under the equivalent provision of the laws of another jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1965; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1979; am §§ 1, 2 ch 36 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 188 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 196 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 40 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 96 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 18 SLA 2010; am § 20 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provisions — Same.

Cross references. —

For restrictions on suspending imposition of sentence, see AS

04.16.200(d)

, AS

12.55.125(f)

, (g), and (

l

),

12.55.135(e)

and (i), AS

16.30.010(c)

, AS

28.33.150(b)

,

28.35.030(b)

and (n), and

28.35.032

(g) and (p).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (f), in the introductory language, added “11.41.360 —

11.41.370

” and “or AS

11.61.125

—

11.61.128

”, and in (f)(3) deleted “substantially” preceding “similar elements to an offense”.

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, at the end of (f)(1), added “, or AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.135

” and made a related change.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 55, SLA 1996 provides that the amendments to subsection (f) made by § 1, ch. 55, SLA 1996 apply “to offenses committed on or after September 4, 1996,” except that references “to prior convictions refer to convictions occurring before, on, or after September 4, 1996”.

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendment of (f) of this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (f) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), relating to the amendment of (f) of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

Sec. 12.55.086.
Imprisonment as a condition of suspended imposition of sentence.

When the imposition of sentence is suspended under AS

12.55.085

, the court may require, as a special condition of probation, that the defendant serve a definite term of continuous or periodic imprisonment, not to exceed the maximum term of imprisonment that could have been imposed. The court may recommend that the defendant serve all or part of the term in a correctional restitution center.

A defendant imprisoned under this section is entitled to a deduction from the term of imprisonment for good conduct under AS

33.20.010

. Unless otherwise specified in the order of suspension of imposition of sentence, a defendant imprisoned under this section is eligible for parole if the term of imprisonment exceeds one year and is eligible for any work furlough, rehabilitation furlough, or similar program available to other state prisoners.

If probation is revoked and the defendant is sentenced to imprisonment, the defendant shall receive credit for time served under this section. Deductions for good conduct under AS

33.20.010

do not constitute “time served.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1979; am § 4 ch 72 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.